zh-CN: 适配横杆: 空气动力学（机翼）横杆; 空气动力学/齐平横杆; 仅夹钳式（无 T 型槽）; 原厂/OEM 横杆; 椭圆形横杆; 圆形横杆; 方形横杆; 兼容 T 型槽; 通用; 其他
pl: Kompatybilna belka poprzeczna: Belki aerodynamiczne (skrzydłowe); Belki aerodynamiczne/zlicowane; Tylko na zacisk (bez rowka T); Belki poprzeczne fabryczne/OEM; Belki owalne; Belki okrągłe; Belki kwadratowe; Kompatybilne z rowkiem T; Uniwersalne; Inne
sv: Kompatibel tvärstång: Aero (vingformade) lastbågar; Aero/infällda lastbågar; Endast klämfäste (inga T-spår); Fabriks-/OEM-lastbågar; Ovala lastbågar; Runda lastbågar; Fyrkantiga lastbågar; Kompatibel med T-spår; Universella; Annat
sk-SK: Kompatibilný priečnik: Aerodynamické tyče (krídlové); Aerodynamické/zapustené tyče; Len s upínaním (bez T-drážky); Továrenské/OEM priečniky; Oválne tyče; Okrúhle tyče; Štvorcové tyče; Kompatibilné s T-drážkou; Univerzálne; Iné
lt-LT: Suderinamas skersinis: Aerodinaminiai (sparno formos) skersiniai; Aerodinaminiai / integruoti skersiniai; Tik užspaudžiami (be T formos griovelio); Gamykliniai / OEM skersiniai; Ovalūs skersiniai; Apvalūs skersiniai; Kvadratiniai skersiniai; Suderinama su T formos grioveliu; Universalūs; Kita
pt-BR: Barra transversal compatível: Barras aerodinâmicas (asa); Barras aerodinâmicas/embutidas; Apenas de fixação (sem trilho em T); Barras transversais de fábrica/originais; Barras ovais; Barras redondas; Barras quadradas; Compatível com trilho em T; Universal; Outro
hu: Kompatibilis keresztléc: Aero (szárny) rudak; Aero/sík rudak; Csak rögzítőbilincses (nincs T-horony); Gyári/OEM keresztrudak; Ovális rudak; Kerek rudak; Szögletes rudak; T-hornyos kompatibilis; Univerzális; Egyéb
el: Συμβατή εγκάρσια μπάρα: Αεροδυναμικές μπάρες (wing); Αεροδυναμικές/ενσωματωμένες μπάρες; Μόνο με σφιγκτήρα (χωρίς εγκοπή T); Εργοστασιακές μπάρες/ΟΕΜ; Οβάλ μπάρες; Στρογγυλές μπάρες; Τετράγωνες μπάρες; Συμβατό με εγκοπή T; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
es: Compatibilidad con barras transversales: Barras aerodinámicas (ala); Barras aerodinámicas/al ras; Solo para abrazadera (sin ranura en T); Barras transversales de fábrica/OEM; Barras ovaladas; Barras redondas; Barras cuadradas; Compatibles con ranura en T; Universales; Otras
ru: Совместимая поперечина: Аэродинамические (крыловидные); Аэродинамические/вровень с крышей; Только зажимные (без Т-образного паза); Заводские/оригинальные поперечины (OEM); Овальные поперечины; Круглые поперечины; Квадратные поперечины; Совместимо с Т-образным пазом; Универсальные; Другое
hr-HR: Kompatibilna prečka: Aero (krilne) šipke; Aero / ravne šipke (flush); Samo na stezanje (bez T-utora); Tvorničke/OEM poprečne šipke; Ovalne šipke; Okrugle šipke; Kvadratne šipke; Kompatibilno s T-utorom; Univerzalno; Ostalo
nb: Kompatibel tverrstang: Aero-stenger (vinge); Aero-/flush-stenger; Kun klemme (ingen T-spor); Fabrikkmonterte/OEM-tverrstenger; Ovale stenger; Runde stenger; Firkantede stenger; Kompatibel med T-spor; Universell; Annet
nl: Compatibele dwarsbalk: Aero (wing)-dragers; Aero/flush-dragers; Alleen klembevestiging (geen T-sleuf); Fabrieks-/OEM-dakdragers; Ovale dragers; Ronde dragers; Vierkante dragers; Compatibel met T-sleuf; Universeel; Overig
en: Compatible crossbar: Aero (wing) bars; Aero/flush bars; Clamp-on only (no T-slot); Factory/OEM crossbars; Oval bars; Round bars; Square bars; T-slot compatible; Universal; Other
sl-SI: Združljiv prečnih drogov: Aero prečke (krilne); Aero/nizkoprofilne prečke; Samo vpenjalno (brez T-utora); Tovarniške/OEM-prečke; Ovalne prečke; Okrogle prečke; Kvadratne prečke; Združljivo s T-utorom; Univerzalno; Drugo
ko: 호환 크로스바: 에어로(윙) 바; 에어로/플러시 바; 클램프온 전용(T 슬롯 없음); 공장/OEM 크로스바; 타원형 바; 원형 바; 정사각형 바; T 슬롯 호환; 범용; 기타
th: คานขวางที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: คานขวางแบบแอโร (ทรงปีก); คานขวางแบบแอโร/แนบหลังคา; แบบหนีบเท่านั้น (ไม่มีร่องตัว T); คานขวางจากโรงงาน/OEM; คานขวางทรงรี; คานขวางทรงกลม; คานขวางทรงสี่เหลี่ยม; รองรับร่องตัว T; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
da: Kompatibel tværstang: Aero-stænger (vinge); Aero-/flush-stænger; Kun fastspænding (ingen T-spor); Fabriks-/OEM-tværstænger; Ovale stænger; Runde stænger; Firkantede stænger; T-spor-kompatibel; Universal; Andet
de: Kompatible Querträger: Aero-Träger (Flügelprofil); Aerodynamische/bündige Träger; Nur zum Klemmen (keine T-Nut); Werks-/OEM-Querträger; Ovale Träger; Runde Träger; Vierkantträger; T-Nut-kompatibel; Universal; Sonstige
it: Traversa compatibile: Barre aerodinamiche (ad ala); Barre aerodinamiche/integrate; Solo con morsetto (senza canalina a T); Barre trasversali di serie/OEM; Barre ovali; Barre rotonde; Barre quadrate; Compatibile con canalina a T; Universali; Altre
ro-RO: Bară transversală compatibilă: Bare aero (aripă); Bare aero/la nivel; Doar cu clemă (fără fantă T); Bare transversale din fabrică/OEM; Bare ovale; Bare rotunde; Bare pătrate; Compatibil cu fanta T; Universal; Altele
vi: Thanh ngang tương thích: Thanh ngang khí động học (cánh); Thanh ngang phẳng/khí động học; Chỉ kẹp (không rãnh chữ T); Thanh ngang nguyên bản/OEM; Thanh ngang hình bầu dục; Thanh ngang tròn; Thanh ngang vuông; Tương thích rãnh chữ T; Đa năng; Khác
zh-TW: 相容的橫桿: 空力 (機翼型) 車頂架; 空力/平齊車頂架; 僅限夾式 (無 T 型槽); 原廠/OEM 車頂架; 橢圓形車頂架; 圓形車頂架; 方形車頂架; 相容於 T 型槽; 通用; 其他
cs: Kompatibilní příčka: Aero tyče (křídlové); Aero/zapuštěné tyče; Pouze s upínáním (bez T-drážky); Tovární/OEM příčníky; Oválné tyče; Kulaté tyče; Čtyřhranné tyče; Kompatibilní s T-drážkou; Univerzální; Jiné
ja: 互換性のあるクロスバー: エアロ (ウィング) バー; エアロ / フラッシュバー; クランプ式のみ (Tスロットなし); 純正 / OEMクロスバー; オーバルバー; ラウンドバー; スクエアバー; Tスロット対応; 汎用; その他
fr: Barre transversale compatible: Barres profilées (en aile); Barres profilées / affleurantes; À pince uniquement (sans rainure en T); Barres de toit d’origine / OEM; Barres ovales; Barres rondes; Barres carrées; Compatible avec rainure en T; Universelles; Autre
bg-BG: Съвместима напречна греда: Аеродинамични греди (тип крило); Аеродинамични/флъш греди; Само за захващане (без T-образен канал); Фабрични/ОЕМ напречни греди; Овални греди; Кръгли греди; Квадратни греди; Съвместими с Т-образен канал; Универсални; Друго
pt-PT: Barra transversal compatível: Barras aerodinâmicas (asa); Barras aerodinâmicas/embutidas; Apenas com grampo (sem ranhura T); Barras transversais de fábrica/OEM; Barras ovais; Barras redondas; Barras quadradas; Compatível com ranhura em T; Universal; Outras
tr: Uyumlu çapraz çubuk: Aero (kanat) çıtalar; Aero/sıfır tavan çıtaları; Yalnızca kelepçeli (T yuvası yok); Fabrika/OEM ara atkılar; Oval çıtalar; Yuvarlak çıtalar; Kare çıtalar; T yuvası uyumlu; Evrensel; Diğer
fi: Yhteensopiva poikittaispalkki: Aero-tangot (siipimalliset); Aero-/flush-tangot; Vain puristinkiinnitys (ei T-uraa); Tehdas-/OEM-kattotelineet; Ovaalit tangot; Pyöreät tangot; Neliötangot; T-urayhteensopiva; Universaali; Muu